Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.110

Rural Washington loan fund.

There is established the rural Washington loan fund which shall be an account in the state treasury. All loan payments of principal and interest which are transferred under RCW 43.168.050 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after legislative appropriation for loans under this chapter. Any expenditures of these moneys shall conform to federal law.

[ 1999 c 164 s 504; 1992 c 235 s 11; 1985 c 164 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Effective date—Severability—1999 c 164: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.